src/fst/morphology/stems/sme-propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2025 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software . You can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # The North Saami proper noun lexicon
! ===========================


LEXICON Prefixes-Prop
        Lulle-:Lul^le∑-         ProperNoun ; ! Lulli-Trøndelaga etc.
        Lulli-:Lul^li∑-         ProperNoun ;
  Lullinuorta-:Lul^li^nuor^ta∑- ProperNoun ;
        Mátta-:Mát^ta∑-         ProperNoun ;
        Davvi-:Dav^vi∑-         ProperNoun ;
        Davve-:Dav^ve∑-         ProperNoun ; ! 76 i korpus, 17 i leksikon
        Gaska-:Gas^ka∑-         ProperNoun ;
       Vuolli-:Vuol^li∑-        ProperNoun ;
       Vuolle-:Vuol^le∑-        ProperNoun ;
        Badje-:Bad^je∑-         ProperNoun ;
        Oarje-:Oar^je∑-         ProperNoun ;
       Orjjel-:Orj^jel∑-        ProperNoun ; ! Orjje 0 i korpus  orjjelsápmi
       Orjješ-:Orj^ješ∑-        ProperNoun ;
       Nuorta-:Nuor^ta∑-        ProperNoun ;
         Ođđa-:Ođ^đa∑-          ProperNoun ;
  Roncen% +MWE:Roncen%          ProperNoun ;


LEXICON ProperNoun-sme-nocomp   !!= * **@CODE@** for no cmp without hyph
Akwé%:% Kon+MWE+CmpNP/First:Akwé%:% Kon BERN-org ; ! Metsähallitus
Bui:Bui ACCRA-plc-not-sur ;
Evá:Evá ACCRA-fem ;
Idá:Idá ACCRA-fem ;
Olá:Olá ACCRA-mal ;
Ádá:Ádá ACCRA-plc-not-sur ;
Ágá:Ágá ACCRA-sur ;
Áne:Áne MARJA-fem ;
Čad:Čad9 BERN-plc-not-sur ;
Čum:Čum9 BERN-org ;
Šua:Šua ACCRA-plc-not-sur ;
